src/fst/morphology/ext-github_kristiank/data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-luzikkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - luzikkõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asLuzikkõ'
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Nom: luzikkõ
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Nom: luzikõd
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Gen: luzika
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Gen: [luzikkoi, luzikkojõ]
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Par: [luzikka, luzikkaa]
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Par: [luzikkoi, luzikkoitõ]
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Ill: [luzikka, luzikkasõ]
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Ill: luzikkoisõ
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Ine: luzikõz
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Ine: luzikkoiz
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Ela: luzikõssõ
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Ela: luzikkoissõ
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+All: luzikgõllõ
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+All: luzikkoillõ
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Ade: luzikõl
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Ade: luzikkoil
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Abl: luzikõltõ
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Abl: luzikkoiltõ
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Tra: luzikõssi
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Tra: luzikkoissi
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Ter: luzikkassaa
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Ter: luzikkoissaa
    luzikkõ+N+Sg+Com: luzikaka
    luzikkõ+N+Pl+Com: luzikkoika
